Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Interstate Medical Licensure Compact:

(a) Bylaws means those bylaws established by the interstate commission pursuant to section 38-3612 for its governance or for directing and controlling its actions and conduct;

(b) Commissioner means the voting representative appointed by each member board pursuant to section 38-3612;

(c) Conviction means a finding by a court that an individual is guilty of a criminal offense through adjudication or entry of a plea of guilty or no contest to the charge by the offender. Evidence of an entry of a conviction of a criminal offense by the court shall be considered final for purposes of disciplinary action by a member board;

(d) Expedited license means a full and unrestricted medical license granted by a member state to an eligible physician through the process set forth in the compact;

(e) Interstate commission means the interstate commission created pursuant to section 38-3612;

(f) License means authorization by a state for a physician to engage in the practice of medicine, which would be unlawful without the authorization;

(g) Medicine and surgery practice act means laws and regulations governing the practice of medicine within a member state;

(h) Member board means a state agency in a member state that acts in the sovereign interests of the state by protecting the public through licensure, regulation, and education of physicians as directed by the state government;

(i) Member state means a state that has enacted the compact;

(j) Practice of medicine means the clinical prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease, injury, or condition requiring a physician to obtain and maintain a license in compliance with the medicine and surgery practice act of a member state;

(k) Physician means any person who:

(1) Is a graduate of a medical school accredited by the Liaison Committee on Medical Education, the Commission on Osteopathic College Accreditation, or a medical school listed in the International Medical Education Directory or its equivalent;

(2) Passed each component of the United States Medical Licensing Examination or the Comprehensive Osteopathic Medical Licensing Examination within three attempts, or any of its predecessor examinations accepted by a state medical board as an equivalent examination for licensure purposes;

(3) Successfully completed graduate medical education approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education or the American Osteopathic Association;

(4) Holds specialty certification or a time-unlimited specialty certificate recognized by the American Board of Medical Specialties or the American Osteopathic Association's Bureau of Osteopathic Specialists;

(5) Possesses a full and unrestricted license to engage in the practice of medicine issued by a member board;

(6) Has never been convicted, received adjudication, deferred adjudication, community supervision, or deferred disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate jurisdiction;

(7) Has never had a license authorizing the practice of medicine subjected to discipline by a licensing agency in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any action related to nonpayment of fees related to a license;

(8) Has never had a controlled substance license or permit suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug Enforcement Administration; and

(9) Is not under active investigation by a licensing agency or law enforcement authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction;

(l) Offense means a felony, gross misdemeanor, or crime of moral turpitude;

(m) Rule means a written statement by the interstate commission promulgated pursuant to section 38-3613 that is of general applicability, implements, interprets, or prescribes a policy or provision of the compact, or an organizational, procedural, or practice requirement of the interstate commission, and has the force and effect of statutory law in a member state, and includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an existing rule;

(n) State means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of the United States; and

(o) State of principal license means a member state where a physician holds a license to practice medicine and which has been designated as such by the physician for purposes of registration and participation in the compact.

Laws 2017, LB88, § 3.